Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 5. SANITATION AND ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY

SUBTITLE G. ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH

CHAPTER 427. TEXAS ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE

Sec. 427.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality.

(2) "Department" means the Department of State Health Services.

(3) "Federal superfund site" means a site defined by the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. Section 9601 et seq.), as amended.

(4) "Immediately surrounding area" means an area determined by the commission to have been significantly exposed to one or more pollutants from the identified site.

(5) "Institute" means the Texas Environmental Health Institute.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 965, Sec. 19.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 12.017, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 427.002. TEXAS ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE. The commission shall enter into an agreement with the department to jointly establish the Texas Environmental Health Institute in order to examine ways to identify, treat, manage, prevent, and reduce health problems associated with environmental contamination.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 965, Sec. 19.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 427.003. PURPOSES. The purposes of the institute are to:

(1) develop a statewide plan to identify health conditions, related or potentially related to environmental contamination, of residents of this state who live or have lived within the immediately surrounding area of a federal superfund site or a state superfund site;

(2) develop a plan to promote and protect the health and safety of residents in immediately surrounding areas by preventing or reducing their health risks from exposure to chemical and biological contaminants, radioactive materials, and other hazards in the environment and the workplace;

(3) develop a plan for informing and educating citizens in immediately surrounding areas about the identified health risks and ways to prevent or reduce exposure;

(4) identify private and federal funding opportunities for institute operations; and

(5) conduct, coordinate, or pursue funding for research concerning short-term and long-term impacts of exposure to environmental contamination.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 965, Sec. 19.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 427.004. PROGRAMS. The commission and the department may establish at the institute any programs necessary to carry out the institute's established purposes under this chapter. The commission and the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission may contract with public or private entities to carry out the institute's purposes.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 965, Sec. 19.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 12.018, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 427.005. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The commission and the department may accept and administer gifts and grants to fund the institute from any individual, corporation, trust, or foundation or the United States, subject to limitations or conditions imposed by law.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 965, Sec. 19.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.